Washington statutes.
RCW 7.52.010

Persons entitled to bring action.

When several persons hold and are in possession of real property as tenants in common, in which one or more of them have an estate of inheritance, or for life or years, an action may be maintained by one or more of such persons, for a partition thereof, according to the respective rights of the persons interested therein, and for sale of such property, or a part of it, if it appear that a partition cannot be made without great prejudice to the owners.

[Code 1881 s 552; 1877 p 117 s 557; 1869 p 133 s 505; RRS s 838.]